Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 17.5. Collision Damage Waiver Act.

§ 59.1-207.28.
Title of chapter.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Collision Damage Waiver Act.”

History.
1988, c. 349.

§ 59.1-207.29.
Scope.

This chapter shall apply (i) to all persons in the business of leasing rental motor vehicles from locations in the Commonwealth under an agreement that imposes upon the lessee an obligation to pay for any damages caused to the leased vehicle and (ii)
to all peer-to-peer vehicle sharing platforms in the Commonwealth facilitating peer-to-peer vehicle sharing under a vehicle sharing platform agreement that imposes upon the shared vehicle driver an obligation to pay for any damages
caused to the shared vehicle. The provisions of this chapter apply solely to the collision damage waiver portion of the rental agreement or vehicle sharing platform agreement. The definitions in §

46.2-1408

apply, mutatis mutandis, to this section.

History.
1988, c. 349; 2020, c. 1266.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1266, in the first sentence, added clause (ii); in the second sentence, added “or vehicle sharing platform agreement”; added the last sentence; and made a stylistic change.

§ 59.1-207.30.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Collision damage waiver” means any contract or contractual provision, whether separate from or a part of a motor vehicle rental agreement, whereby the lessor agrees, for a charge, to waive any and all claims against the lessee for any damages to the
rental motor vehicle during the term of the rental agreement.

“Lessor” means any person or organization in the business of providing rental motor vehicles to the public.

“Lessee” means any person or organization obtaining the use of a rental motor vehicle from a lessor under the terms of a rental agreement.

“Rental agreement” means any written agreement setting forth the terms and conditions governing the use of the rental motor vehicle by the lessee.

“Rental motor vehicle” means a private passenger type vehicle or commercial type vehicle which, upon execution of a rental agreement, is made available to a lessee for its use.

History.
1988, c. 349.

§ 59.1-207.31.
Required notice.

The definitions in §

46.2-1408

apply, mutatis mutandis, to this section.

No lessor or peer-to-peer vehicle sharing platform shall sell or offer to sell to a lessee a collision damage waiver as a part of a rental agreement or vehicle sharing platform agreement unless the lessor or peer-to-peer vehicle sharing platform first
provides the lessee or shared vehicle driver the following written notice:NOTICE: THIS CONTRACT OFFERS, FOR AN ADDITIONAL CHARGE, A COLLISION DAMAGE WAIVER TO COVER YOUR RESPONSIBILITY FOR DAMAGE TO THE VEHICLE. BEFORE DECIDING
WHETHER TO PURCHASE THE COLLISION DAMAGE WAIVER, YOU MAY WISH TO DETERMINE WHETHER YOUR OWN VEHICLE INSURANCE AFFORDS YOU COVERAGE FOR DAMAGE TO THE RENTAL VEHICLE AND THE AMOUNT OF THE DEDUCTIBLE UNDER YOUR OWN INSURANCE COVERAGE.
THE PURCHASE OF THIS COLLISION DAMAGE WAIVER IS NOT MANDATORY AND MAY BE WAIVED.

Such notice shall be made on the face of the rental agreement or vehicle sharing platform agreement either by stamp, label, or as part of the written contract, shall be set apart in boldface type and in no smaller print than 10-point type, and shall include
a space for the lessee or shared vehicle driver, as defined in §

46.2-1408

, to acknowledge his receipt of the notice.

History.
1988, c. 349; 2020, c. 1266.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1266 added subsection A and redesignated accordingly; in subsection B, inserted “or peer-to-peer vehicle sharing platform” twice, “or vehicle sharing platform agreement” and “or shared vehicle driver”; in subsection C, inserted
“or vehicle sharing platform agreement” and “or shared vehicle driver, as defined in §

46.2-1408

” and made stylistic changes.

§ 59.1-207.32.
Prohibited exclusion.

No collision damage waiver subject to this chapter shall contain an exclusion from the waiver for damages caused by the ordinary negligence of the lessee or shared vehicle driver, as defined in §

46.2-1408

. Any such exclusion in violation of this section shall be void. This section shall not be deemed to prohibit an exclusion from the waiver for damages caused intentionally by the lessee or shared vehicle driver or as
a result of his willful or wanton misconduct or gross negligence, driving while intoxicated or under the influence of any drug or alcohol, or damages caused while engaging in any speed contest.

History.
1988, c. 349; 2020, c. 1266.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1266, in the first sentence, added “or shared vehicle driver, as defined in §

46.2-1408

” at the end; and in the last sentence, inserted “or shared vehicle driver.”

§ 59.1-207.33.
Enforcement; penalties.

Any violation of the provisions of this chapter shall constitute a prohibited practice pursuant to the provisions of § 59.1-200 and shall be subject to any and all of the enforcement provisions of the Virginia Consumer Protection Act (§ 59.1-196 et seq.)
of this title.

History.
1988, c. 349.